Utah statutes.
19-2-106.   Rulemaking authority and procedure.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no rule which the board makes for
the purpose of administering a program under the federal Clean Air Act may be
more stringent than the corresponding federal regulations which address the
same circumstances.  In making rules, the board may incorporate by reference
corresponding federal regulations.
(2)  The board may make rules more stringent than corresponding federal
regulations for the purpose described in Subsection (1), only if it makes a
written finding after public comment and hearing and based on evidence in the
record, that corresponding federal regulations are not adequate to protect
public health and the environment of the state.  Those findings shall be
accompanied by an opinion referring to and evaluating the public health and
environmental information and studies contained in the record which form the
basis for the board's conclusion.
